Rhode Island statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 15 Scenic Highways

24-15-1.
Purpose.

In order to create and preserve rustic and scenic highways for vehicular, bicycle, and pedestrian travel in unhurried, quiet, and leisurely enjoyment; to protect and preserve recreational driving, culture, beauty, trees, vegetation, shoreline, and wildlife by establishing protective standards of scenic highway design, speed, maintenance, and identification, which will promote a continuous system of scenic highways and scenic easements for the public health and welfare; a state system of scenic highways is created.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 398, § 1.

24-15-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Board” means the scenic roadways board.

“Director” means the director of the department of transportation.

“Municipality” means a city or town.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 398, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 233, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 157; P.L. 2005, ch. 228, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 315, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 415, § 34.

24-15-3.
Designation as a scenic highway.

The director, or the governing body of any municipality as to any highway (including a state highway) within its borders, may apply to the board for the designation of a highway as a scenic highway. A municipality making application for a state highway shall notify the director of the Rhode Island department of transportation. The director shall have thirty (30) days to comment on the application. After holding a public hearing, the board shall approve or deny the application for designation of a highway as a scenic highway submitted under this section. Provided, however, that prior to any approval or denial of any application, the applicant shall notify the owners of the properties fronting the application area that an application has been filed and the board shall provide the fronting property owners with an opportunity to attend a public hearing in the municipality subject to the application, and in the Town of Westerly no application for designation of a highway or road, or portion of a highway or road, shall be approved unless the owners of a majority of the lineal lot frontage abutting the highway or road agree to the designation by filing with the director or governing municipal body, within sixty (60) days immediately following the application, a written statement or statements agreeing to the designation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 398, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 354, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 369, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 55, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 363, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 422, § 1.

24-15-4.
Withdrawal of highways from scenic highways system.

After holding a public hearing, the director, or the governing body of any municipality as to any scenic highway (including a state highway) within its borders, may apply to the board for, and the board itself may propose, the removal of a highway from the scenic highway system. The board shall thereupon approve or deny the removal of the highway from its designation as a scenic highway. Provided, however, that no application for removal of a highway or road, or portion thereof, from the scenic highways system, shall be approved unless the owners of a majority of the lineal lot frontage abutting the highway or road agree to the removal by filing an application with the director or governing municipal body, within the sixty (60) days immediately preceding the application, a written statement or statements agreeing to the removal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 398, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 354, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 369, § 1.

24-15-5.
Joint jurisdiction of highways.

Highways under the joint jurisdiction of two (2) or more municipalities may not be designated scenic highways or be withdrawn from the scenic highway system until after approval by the governing bodies of all affected municipalities and the board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 398, § 1.

24-15-6.
Local authority.

The director and the municipalities and all other authorities shall have the same authority over scenic highways as they possess over other highways under their jurisdiction except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 398, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 157.

24-15-7.
Funding.

State aid for scenic highways shall be determined in accordance with the local transportation funding as provided in these general laws.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 398, § 1.

24-15-8.
Scenic highways marking signs — State payment.

The department of transportation shall pay the cost of furnishing and installing scenic highway marking signs on officially designated scenic highways.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 398, § 1.

24-15-9.
Rules and standards.

The board shall promulgate rules and establish standards for the maintenance, identification, construction, use, and preservation of the scenic highways system. The board may establish rules and standards for regulating and limiting the construction or establishment of a highway which is inconsistent with the purpose of this chapter. No rule or regulation may be adopted or promulgated which affects any provision of the general laws of the state or any federal statutory provision without the prior approval of the general assembly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 398, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 187, § 3.

24-15-10.
Creation of board.

There is hereby authorized, created and established within the executive department a scenic roadways board consisting of eleven (11) members as follows: one member shall be the director of the department of transportation or his or her designee who shall be a subordinate within the department of transportation; one member shall be the director of the department of environmental management or his or her designee who shall be a subordinate within the department of environmental management; one member shall be the chair of the historic preservation commission; one member shall be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate giving due consideration to the recommendation of Grow Smart Rhode Island; one member shall be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate giving due consideration to the recommendation of the Rhode Island builders association; six (6) members shall be appointed by the governor from the general public with the advice and consent of the senate, in making these appointments, the governor shall take into consideration the impact on the local communities. The governor shall give due consideration to members of local land trusts, chamber of commerce recommendations and shall also consider the need for individuals with expertise in landscape architecture, community planning, and/or transportation engineers with experience with traffic calming and flexible design policies. The members shall be chosen as far as is reasonably practicable to represent geographical diversity and communities where designated scenic roadways exist. During the month of January, in each year the governor shall appoint a member to succeed the departing member. The newly appointed member shall serve for a term of three (3) years or until their respective successors are appointed and qualified. The members of the board shall be eligible to succeed themselves. Any vacancy of a public member which may occur in the board shall be filled by appointment by the governor for the remainder of the unexpired term in the same manner as the member’s predecessor as prescribed in this section. The membership of the board shall receive no compensation for their services, and shall not be reimbursed for any expenses. Those members of the board as of the effective date of this act [July 9, 2005] who were appointed to the board by members of the general assembly shall cease to be members of the board on the effective date of this act, and the governor shall thereupon appoint the four (4) new members as prescribed in this section. Those members of the board as of the effective date of this act [July 9, 2005] who were appointed to the board by the governor shall continue to serve the balance of their current terms. Upon the expiration of the term of the member representing the Audubon Society of Rhode Island, the governor shall appoint a new member, and shall give due consideration to the recommendation of Grow Smart Rhode Island. Thereafter, the appointments shall be made by the governor as prescribed in this section. No one shall be eligible for appointment unless he or she is a resident of this state. The director of the department of transportation shall direct staff to support the board within the constraints of available resources.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 398, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 233, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 55; P.L. 2005, ch. 228, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 315, § 1.

24-15-10.1.
Chair, quorum and removal for cause.

Upon the passage of this act and the appointment and qualification of the four (4) new members prescribed in §

24-15-10

, the board shall meet at the call of the director of transportation and shall elect from among the members a chair and a vice-chair. Thereafter, the board shall annually elect in February a chair and a vice-chair from among the members. The board may elect from among its members such other officers as it deems necessary.

Six (6) members of the board shall constitute a quorum, and a majority vote of those present and voting shall be required for action.

Members of the board shall be removable by the governor pursuant to §

36-1-7

and for cause only, and removal solely for partisan or personal reasons unrelated to capacity or fitness for the office shall be unlawful.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 228, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 315, § 2.

24-15-10.2.
Powers and duties.

In addition to the duties and powers conferred upon the board by this chapter, it has the following additional duties and powers:

To conduct a training course for newly appointed and qualified members and new designees of ex-officio members within six (6) months of their qualification or designation. The course shall be developed by the chair of the board, approved by the board, and conducted by the chair of the board. The board may approve the use of any board or staff members or other individuals to assist with training. It shall include instruction in the following areas: the provisions of chapters 25-15, 42-46, 36-14 and 38-2; and the board’s rules and regulations. The director of the department of administration shall, within ninety (90) days of the effective date of this act, prepare and disseminate training materials relating to the provisions of chapters 42-46, 36-14 and 38-2.

To approve and submit, an annual report within ninety (90) days after the end of each fiscal year to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and the secretary of state of its activities during that fiscal year. The report shall provide: an operating statement summarizing meetings or hearings held, including meeting minutes, subjects addressed, decisions rendered, applications considered and their disposition, rules or regulations promulgated, studies conducted, policies and plans developed, approved, or modified, and programs administered or initiated; a consolidated financial statement of all funds received and expended including the source of the funds, a listing of any staff supported by these funds, and a summary of any clerical, administrative or technical support received; a summary of performance during the previous fiscal year including accomplishments, shortcomings and remedies; a synopsis of any legal matters related to the authority of the board; a summary of any training courses held pursuant to this section; a briefing on anticipated activities in the upcoming fiscal year; and findings and recommendations for improvements. The report shall be posted electronically as prescribed in §

42-20-8.2

. The director of the department of administration shall be responsible for the enforcement of this provision.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 228, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 315, § 2.